Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB59.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13 of the act of May 3, 1933 (P.L.242, No.86), referred to as the Cosmetology Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Powers and Duties of Board.--* * *(d) The board shall appoint inspectors whose title shall be "Inspector, State Board of Cosmetology, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania." Each inspector shall be a licensed cosmetologist who has been actively engaged in the practice of cosmetology for at least five years. Each inspector shall hold office at the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 pleasure of the board and shall receive compensation as fixed by the board with the approval of the department. Each inspector shall have the right of entry into any place where the business or profession of cosmetology is carried out for the purpose of inspection and for the investigation of complaints before the board and for other matters as the board may direct.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0059PN0049 - 2 - 1234567